North Dakota, session 69, HB1364.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 3 of section 39-08-01.5 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
3. If a defendant convicted of a misdemeanor under section 39-08-01 is sentenced to drug court,
mental health court, or veterans treatment docket and successfully completes a drug court
program, mental health court, or veterans treatment docket, the court shall dismiss the case
and seal the file in accordance with section 12.1-32-07.2. The court also shall issue an order
to the director to remove the conviction and suspension based on the conviction from the
driving record of the defendant, unless doing so is prohibited by title 49, Code of Federal
Regulations, section 383.51, or other federal or state law.

H. B. NO. 1364 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1364.
House Vote: Yeas 86 Nays 1 Absent 7
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State